Ohio, session 136, HB516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.973 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.973. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes 8
of state route number five between state route number fifty-nine 9
and interstate route eighty, in Portage county and Trumbull 10
county, shall be known as the "83rd Ohio Division Memorial 11
Highway." 12
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 13
along the highway indicating its name. 14